Nebraska, session 109, LB1056.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1056 LB1056
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 48-120, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-120 (1)(a) The employer is liable for all reasonable medical,
surgical, and hospital services, including plastic surgery or
reconstructive surgery but not cosmetic surgery when the injury has
caused disfigurement, appliances, supplies, prosthetic devices, and
medicines as and when needed, which are required by the nature of the
injury and which will relieve pain or promote and hasten the employee's
restoration to health and employment, and includes damage to or
destruction of artificial members, dental appliances, teeth, hearing
instruments, and eyeglasses, but, in the case of dental appliances,
hearing instruments, or eyeglasses, only if such damage or destruction
resulted from an accident which also caused personal injury entitling the
employee to compensation therefor for disability or treatment, subject to
the approval of and regulation by the Nebraska Workers' Compensation
Court, not to exceed the regular charge made for such service in similar
cases. If the employee cannot readily understand or communicate in
English or another language spoken by a service provider, the employer
shall be liable for all reasonable costs of interpretation services
related to such medical, surgical, or hospital services. The interpreter
shall be selected by the employee or the employee's representative from
the interpreter register created in Rule 6-702 of the Nebraska Supreme
Court Rules.
(b) Except as provided in section 48-120.04, the compensation court
shall establish schedules of fees for such services. The compensation
court shall review such schedules at least biennially and adopt
appropriate changes when necessary. The compensation court may contract
with any person, firm, corporation, organization, or government agency to
secure adequate data to establish such fees. The compensation court shall
publish and furnish to the public the fee schedules established pursuant
to this subdivision and section 48-120.04. The compensation court may
-2-

LB1056 LB1056
2026 2026
establish and charge a fee to recover the cost of published fee
schedules.
(c) Reimbursement for inpatient hospital services provided by
hospitals located in or within fifteen miles of a Nebraska city of the
metropolitan class or primary class and by other hospitals with fifty-one
or more licensed beds shall be according to the Diagnostic Related Group
inpatient hospital fee schedule or the trauma services inpatient hospital
fee schedule established in section 48-120.04.
(d) A workers' compensation insurer, risk management pool, self-
insured employer, or managed care plan certified pursuant to section
48-120.02 may contract with a provider or provider network for medical,
surgical, or hospital services. Such contract may establish fees for
services different than the fee schedules established under subdivision
(1)(b) of this section or established under section 48-120.04. Such
contract shall be in writing and mutually agreed upon prior to the date
services are provided.
(e) The provider or supplier of such services shall not collect or
attempt to collect from any employer, insurer, government, or injured
employee or dependent or the estate of any injured or deceased employee
any amount in excess of (i) the fee established by the compensation court
for any such service, (ii) the fee established under section 48-120.04,
or (iii) the fee contracted under subdivision (1)(d) of this section,
including any finance charge or late penalty.
(2)(a)(i) (2)(a) The employee has the right to select a physician
who has maintained the employee's medical records prior to an injury and
has a documented history of treatment with the employee prior to an
injury or a physician who has maintained the medical records of an
immediate family member of the employee prior to an injury and has a
documented history of treatment with an immediate family member of the
employee prior to an injury. If there is no such physician, the employee
may select a physician within a timeframe established by the compensation
-3-

LB1056 LB1056
2026 2026
court. For purposes of this subsection, immediate family member means the
employee's spouse, children, parents, stepchildren, and stepparents.
(ii) The employer shall notify the employee following an injury of
such right of selection in a form and manner and within a timeframe
established by the compensation court. If the employee cannot readily
understand or communicate in English or another language spoken by the
employer, then the employer shall, at no cost to such employee, provide
such notice to the employee in a language understood by the employee. If
the employer fails to notify the employee of such right of selection, or
fails to notify the employee of such right of selection in a form and
manner and within a timeframe established by the compensation court, or
fails to notify the employee of such right of selection in the manner
required by this subdivision, then the employee has the right to select a
physician. If the employee fails to exercise such right of selection in a
form and manner and within a timeframe established by the compensation
court following notice by the employer pursuant to this subsection, then
the employer has the right to select the physician.
(iii) If selection of the initial physician is made by the employee
or employer pursuant to this subsection following notice by the employer
pursuant to this subsection, the employee or employer shall not change
the initial selection of physician made pursuant to this subsection
unless such change is agreed to by the employee and employer or is
ordered by the compensation court pursuant to subsection (6) of this
section.
(iv) If compensability is denied by the workers' compensation
insurer, risk management pool, or self-insured employer, (A) (i) the
employee has the right to select a physician and shall not be made to
enter a managed care plan and (B) (ii) the employer is liable for
medical, surgical, and hospital services subsequently found to be
compensable.
(v) If the employer has exercised the right to select a physician
-4-

LB1056 LB1056
2026 2026
pursuant to this subsection and if the compensation court subsequently
orders reasonable medical services previously refused to be furnished to
the employee by the physician selected by the employer, the compensation
court shall allow the employee to select another physician to furnish
further medical services.
(vi) If the employee selects a physician located in a community not
the home or place of work of the employee and a physician is available in
the local community or in a closer community, no travel expenses shall be
required to be paid by the employer or his or her workers' compensation
insurer.
(b) In cases of injury requiring dismemberment or injuries involving
major surgical operation, the employee may designate to his or her
employer the physician or surgeon to perform the operation.
(c) If the injured employee unreasonably refuses or neglects to
avail himself or herself of medical or surgical treatment furnished by
the employer, except as herein and otherwise provided, the employer is
not liable for an aggravation of such injury due to such refusal and
neglect and the compensation court or judge thereof may suspend, reduce,
or limit the compensation otherwise payable under the Nebraska Workers'
Compensation Act.
(d) If, due to the nature of the injury or its occurrence away from
the employer's place of business, the employee or the employer is unable
to select a physician using the procedures provided by this subsection,
the selection requirements of this subsection shall not apply as long as
the inability to make a selection persists.
(e) The physician selected may arrange for any consultation,
referral, or extraordinary or other specialized medical services as the
nature of the injury requires.
(f) The employer is not responsible for medical services furnished
or ordered by any physician or other person selected by the employee in
disregard of this section. Except as otherwise provided by the Nebraska
-5-

LB1056 LB1056
2026 2026
Workers' Compensation Act, the employer is not liable for medical,
surgical, or hospital services or medicines if the employee refuses to
allow them to be furnished by the employer.
(3) No claim for such medical treatment is valid and enforceable
unless, within fourteen days following the first treatment, the physician
giving such treatment furnishes the employer a report of such injury and
treatment on a form prescribed by the compensation court. The
compensation court may excuse the failure to furnish such report within
fourteen days when it finds it to be in the interest of justice to do so.
(4) All physicians and other providers of medical services attending
injured employees shall comply with all the rules and regulations adopted
and promulgated by the compensation court and shall make such reports as
may be required by it at any time and at such times as required by it
upon the condition or treatment of any injured employee or upon any other
matters concerning cases in which they are employed. All medical and
hospital information relevant to the particular injury shall, on demand,
be made available to the employer, the employee, the workers'
compensation insurer, and the compensation court. The party requesting
such medical and hospital information shall pay the cost thereof. No such
relevant information developed in connection with treatment or
examination for which compensation is sought shall be considered a
privileged communication for purposes of a workers' compensation claim.
When a physician or other provider of medical services willfully fails to
make any report required of him or her under this section, the
compensation court may order the forfeiture of his or her right to all or
part of payment due for services rendered in connection with the
particular case.
(5) Whenever the compensation court deems it necessary, in order to
assist it in resolving any issue of medical fact or opinion, it shall
cause the employee to be examined by a physician or physicians selected
by the compensation court and obtain from such physician or physicians a
-6-

LB1056 LB1056
2026 2026
report upon the condition or matter which is the subject of inquiry. The
compensation court may charge the cost of such examination to the
workers' compensation insurer. The cost of such examination shall include
the payment to the employee of all necessary and reasonable expenses
incident to such examination, such as transportation, and loss of wages,
and interpreter services.
(6) The compensation court shall have the authority to determine the
necessity, character, and sufficiency of any medical or interpreter
services furnished or to be furnished and shall have authority to order a
change of physician, hospital, rehabilitation facility, or other medical
or interpreter services when it deems such change is desirable or
necessary. Any dispute regarding medical, surgical, or hospital, or
interpreter services furnished or to be furnished under this section may
be submitted by the parties, the supplier of such service, or the
compensation court on its own motion for informal dispute resolution by a
staff member of the compensation court or an outside mediator pursuant to
section 48-168. In addition, any party or the compensation court on its
own motion may submit such a dispute for a medical finding by an
independent medical examiner pursuant to section 48-134.01. Issues
submitted for informal dispute resolution or for a medical finding by an
independent medical examiner may include, but are not limited to, the
reasonableness and necessity of any medical treatment previously provided
or to be provided to the injured employee. The compensation court may
adopt and promulgate rules and regulations regarding informal dispute
resolution or the submission of disputes to an independent medical
examiner that are considered necessary to effectuate the purposes of this
section.
(7) For the purpose of this section, physician has the same meaning
as in section 48-151.
(8) The compensation court shall order the employer to make payment
directly to the supplier of any services provided for in this section or
-7-

LB1056 LB1056
2026 2026
reimbursement to anyone who has made any payment to the supplier for
services provided in this section. No such supplier or payor may be made
or become a party to any action before the compensation court.
(9) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a workers'
compensation insurer, risk management pool, or self-insured employer may
contract for medical, surgical, hospital, and rehabilitation services to
be provided through a managed care plan certified pursuant to section
48-120.02. Once liability for medical, surgical, and hospital services
has been accepted or determined, the employer may require that employees
subject to the contract receive medical, surgical, and hospital services
in the manner prescribed in the contract, except that an employee may
receive services from a physician selected by the employee pursuant to
subsection (2) of this section if the physician so selected agrees to
refer the employee to the managed care plan for any other treatment that
the employee may require and if the physician so selected agrees to
comply with all the rules, terms, and conditions of the managed care
plan. If compensability is denied by the workers' compensation insurer,
risk management pool, or self-insured employer, the employee may leave
the managed care plan and the employer is liable for medical, surgical,
and hospital services previously provided. The workers' compensation
insurer, risk management pool, or self-insured employer shall give notice
to employees subject to the contract of eligible service providers and
such other information regarding the contract and manner of receiving
medical, surgical, and hospital services under the managed care plan as
the compensation court may prescribe.
Sec. 2. Section 48-121, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
48-121 The following schedule of compensation is hereby established
for injuries resulting in disability:
(1) For total disability, the compensation during such disability
shall be eighty sixty-six and two-thirds percent of the wages received at
-8-

LB1056 LB1056
2026 2026
the time of injury, but such compensation shall not be more than the
maximum weekly income benefit specified in section 48-121.01 nor less
than the minimum weekly income benefit specified in section 48-121.01 ,
except that if at the time of injury the employee receives wages of less
than the minimum weekly income benefit specified in section 48-121.01,
then he or she shall receive the full amount of such wages per week as
compensation. Nothing in this subdivision shall require payment of
compensation after disability shall cease;
(2) For disability partial in character, except the particular cases
mentioned in subdivision (3) of this section, the compensation shall be
seventy-five sixty-six and two-thirds percent of the difference between
the wages received at the time of the injury and the earning power of the
employee thereafter, but such compensation shall not be more than the
maximum weekly income benefit specified in section 48-121.01. This
compensation shall be paid during the period of such partial disability
but not beyond five three hundred weeks. Should total disability be
followed by partial disability, the period of five three hundred weeks
mentioned in this subdivision shall be reduced by the number of weeks
during which compensation was paid for such total disability;
(3) For disability resulting from permanent injury of the classes
listed in this subdivision, the compensation shall be in addition to the
amount paid for temporary disability, except that the compensation for
temporary disability shall cease as soon as the extent of the permanent
disability is ascertainable. For disability resulting from permanent
injury of the following classes, compensation shall be: For the loss of a
thumb, seventy-five sixty-six and two-thirds percent of daily wages
during sixty weeks. For the loss of a first finger, commonly called the
index finger, seventy-five sixty-six and two-thirds percent of daily
wages during thirty-five weeks. For the loss of a second finger, seventy-
five sixty-six and two-thirds percent of daily wages during thirty weeks.
For the loss of a third finger, seventy-five sixty-six and two-thirds
-9-

LB1056 LB1056
2026 2026
percent of daily wages during twenty weeks. For the loss of a fourth
finger, commonly called the little finger, seventy-five sixty-six and
two-thirds percent of daily wages during fifteen weeks. The loss of the
first phalange of the thumb or of any finger shall be considered to be
equal to the loss of one-half of such thumb or finger and compensation
shall be for one-half of the periods of time above specified, and the
compensation for the loss of one-half of the first phalange shall be for
one-fourth of the periods of time above specified. The loss of more than
one phalange shall be considered as the loss of the entire finger or
thumb, except that in no case shall the amount received for more than one
finger exceed the amount provided in this schedule for the loss of a
hand. For the loss of a great toe, seventy-five sixty-six and two-thirds
percent of daily wages during thirty weeks. For the loss of one of the
toes other than the great toe, seventy-five sixty-six and two-thirds
percent of daily wages during ten weeks. The loss of the first phalange
of any toe shall be considered equal to the loss of one-half of such toe,
and compensation shall be for one-half of the periods of time above
specified. The loss of more than one phalange shall be considered as the
loss of the entire toe. For the loss of a hand, seventy-five sixty-six
and two-thirds percent of daily wages during one hundred seventy-five
weeks. For the loss of an arm, seventy-five sixty-six and two-thirds
percent of daily wages during two hundred twenty-five weeks. For the loss
of a foot, seventy-five sixty-six and two-thirds percent of daily wages
during one hundred fifty weeks. For the loss of a leg, seventy-five
sixty-six and two-thirds percent of daily wages during two hundred
fifteen weeks. For the loss of an eye, seventy-five sixty-six and two-
thirds percent of daily wages during one hundred twenty-five weeks. For
the loss of an ear, seventy-five sixty-six and two-thirds percent of
daily wages during twenty-five weeks. For the loss of hearing in one ear,
seventy-five sixty-six and two-thirds percent of daily wages during fifty
weeks. For the loss of the nose, seventy-five sixty-six and two-thirds
-10-

LB1056 LB1056
2026 2026
percent of daily wages during fifty weeks.
In any case in which there is a loss or loss of use of more than one
member or parts of more than one member set forth in this subdivision,
but not amounting to total and permanent disability, compensation
benefits shall be paid for the loss or loss of use of each such member or
part thereof, with the periods of benefits to run consecutively. The
total loss or permanent total loss of use of both hands, or both arms, or
both feet, or both legs, or both eyes, or hearing in both ears, or of any
two thereof, in one accident, shall constitute total and permanent
disability and be compensated for according to subdivision (1) of this
section. In all other cases involving a loss or loss of use of both
hands, both arms, both feet, both legs, both eyes, or hearing in both
ears, or of any two thereof, total and permanent disability shall be
determined in accordance with the facts. Amputation between the elbow and
the wrist shall be considered as the equivalent of the loss of a hand,
and amputation between the knee and the ankle shall be considered as the
equivalent of the loss of a foot. Amputation at or above the elbow shall
be considered as the loss of an arm, and amputation at or above the knee
shall be considered as the loss of a leg. Permanent total loss of the use
of a finger, hand, arm, foot, leg, or eye shall be considered as the
equivalent of the loss of such finger, hand, arm, foot, leg, or eye. In
all cases involving a permanent partial loss of the use or function of
any of the members mentioned in this subdivision, the compensation shall
bear such relation to the amounts named in such subdivision as the
disabilities bear to those produced by the injuries named therein.
If, in the compensation court's discretion, compensation benefits
payable for a loss or loss of use of more than one hand, arm, foot, or
leg, or any combination thereof, resulting from the same accident or
illness, do not adequately compensate the employee for such loss or loss
of use and such loss or loss of use results in at least a thirty percent
loss of earning capacity, the compensation court shall, upon request of
-11-

LB1056 LB1056
2026 2026
the employee, determine the employee's loss of earning capacity
consistent with the process for such determination under subdivision (1)
or (2) of this section, and in such a case the employee shall not be
entitled to compensation under this subdivision. Loss or loss of use of
multiple parts of the same arm, including the hand and fingers, or loss
or loss of use of multiple parts of the same leg, including the foot and
toes, resulting from the same accident or illness shall not entitle the
employee to compensation under subdivision (1) or (2) of this section.
If the employer and the employee are unable to agree upon the amount
of compensation to be paid in cases not covered by the schedule, the
amount of compensation shall be settled according to sections 48-173 to
48-185. Compensation under this subdivision shall not be more than the
maximum weekly income benefit specified in section 48-121.01 nor less
than the minimum weekly income benefit specified in section 48-121.01 ,
except that if at the time of the injury the employee received wages of
less than the minimum weekly income benefit specified in section
48-121.01, then he or she shall receive the full amount of such wages per
week as compensation;
(4) For disability resulting from permanent disability, if
immediately prior to the accident the rate of wages was fixed by the day
or hour, or by the output of the employee, the weekly wages shall be
taken to be computed upon the basis of a workweek of a minimum of five
days, if the wages are paid by the day, or upon the basis of a workweek
of a minimum of forty hours, if the wages are paid by the hour, or upon
the basis of a workweek of a minimum of five days or forty hours,
whichever results in the higher weekly wage, if the wages are based on
the output of the employee; and
(5) The employee shall be entitled to compensation from his or her
employer for temporary disability while undergoing physical or medical
rehabilitation and while undergoing vocational rehabilitation whether
such vocational rehabilitation is voluntarily offered by the employer and
-12-

LB1056 LB1056
2026 2026
accepted by the employee or is ordered by the Nebraska Workers'
Compensation Court or any judge of the compensation court; and .
(6)(a) Beginning in 2027, weekly income benefits under this section
lasting longer than twelve months shall be adjusted to account for
increases in the cost of living.
(b) For purposes of this subdivision, COLA percentage means the
greater of:
(i) One percent; or
(ii) The percentage change, for the most recent twelve-month period
for which information is available, in the Consumer Price Index for Urban
Wage Earners and Clerical Workers, as prepared by the United States
Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics.
(c) On January 1, 2027, and on each January 1 thereafter, the
Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court shall determine the COLA percentage
that will apply for such calendar year.
(d) If a person receives a weekly income benefit under this section
that lasts longer than twelve months, the person's weekly income benefit
shall be automatically adjusted at the end of each twelve-month period.
The adjusted amount shall equal the then-current weekly income benefit
amount multiplied by the COLA percentage in effect for that calendar
year. The adjusted amount shall be computed to the next higher whole
dollar amount. Such adjusted amount shall apply for the next twelve-month
period.
(e) The cost-of-living adjustment provided for in this subdivision
shall not result in a weekly income benefit that is more than the maximum
weekly income benefit specified in section 48-121.01 that is in effect at
the time the adjustment is made.
Sec. 3. Section 48-121.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-121.01 (1)(a)(i) Commencing July 1, 1991, the maximum weekly
income benefit under sections 48-121 and 48-122 shall be two hundred
-13-

LB1056 LB1056
2026 2026
sixty-five dollars.
(ii) Commencing June 1, 1994, the maximum weekly income benefit
under sections 48-121 and 48-122 shall be three hundred ten dollars.
(iii) Commencing January 1, 1995, the maximum weekly income benefit
under sections 48-121 and 48-122 shall be three hundred fifty dollars.
(1)(a) (b) Commencing January 1, 1996, and each January 1 thereafter
until January 1, 2027, the maximum weekly income benefit under sections
48-121 and 48-122 shall be one hundred percent, computed to the next
higher whole dollar, of the state average weekly wage determined pursuant
to section 48-121.02, except that for the purposes of calendar years
commencing after 1996, the Governor may not later than November 15, 1996,
and not later than each November 15 thereafter, conduct a public hearing
after not less than thirty days' notice to consider whether he or she
should issue an order to suspend the effectiveness of the change in the
maximum weekly income benefit otherwise required by this subdivision for
the ensuing calendar year.
(b) Commencing January 1, 2027, and each January 1 thereafter, the
maximum weekly income benefit under sections 48-121 and 48-122 shall be
two hundred percent, computed to the next higher whole dollar, of the
state average weekly wage determined pursuant to section 48-121.02,
except that for the purposes of calendar years commencing after 2027, the
Governor may not later than November 15, 2027, and not later than each
November 15 thereafter, conduct a public hearing after not less than
thirty days' notice to consider whether the Governor should issue an
order to suspend the effectiveness of the change in the maximum weekly
income benefit otherwise required by this subdivision for the ensuing
calendar year.
(c) In order to make his or her decision under subdivision (1)(a) or
(b) of this section, the Governor shall consider such factors as recent
trends in economic conditions in the state, general wage levels, workers'
compensation benefit levels, and workers' compensation premium levels.
-14-

LB1056 LB1056
2026 2026
After such hearing but not later than November 30 immediately thereafter,
the Governor may issue an order to suspend the effectiveness of the
change in the maximum weekly income benefit otherwise required by this
subdivision (1)(a) or (b) of this section for the ensuing calendar year.
(2) The minimum weekly income benefit under sections 48-121 and
48-122 shall be fifty percent, computed to the next higher whole dollar,
of the state average weekly wage determined pursuant to section
48-121.02, except that if at the time of injury an employee receives
wages of less than such amount, the minimum weekly income benefit for
such employee shall be the full amount of such wages per week forty-nine
dollars.
Sec. 4. Section 48-122, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-122 (1) If death results from injuries and the deceased employee
leaves one or more dependents dependent upon his or her earnings for
support at the time of injury, the compensation, subject to section
48-123, shall be not more than the maximum weekly income benefit
specified in section 48-121.01 nor less than the minimum weekly income
benefit specified in section 48-121.01 , except that if at the time of
injury the employee receives wages of less than the minimum weekly income
benefit specified in section 48-121.01, then the compensation shall be
the full amount of such wages per week, payable in the amount and to the
persons enumerated in section 48-122.01 subject to the maximum limits
specified in this section and section 48-122.03.
(2) When death results from injuries suffered in employment, if
immediately prior to the accident the rate of wages was fixed by the day
or hour, or by the output of the employee, the weekly wages shall be
taken to be computed upon the basis of a workweek of a minimum of five
days, if the wages are paid by the day, or upon the basis of a workweek
of a minimum of forty hours, if the wages are paid by the hour, or upon
the basis of a workweek of a minimum of five days or forty hours,
-15-

LB1056 LB1056
2026 2026
whichever results in the higher weekly wage, if the wages are based on
the output of the employee.
(3) Upon the death of an employee, resulting through personal
injuries as defined in section 48-151, whether or not there are
dependents entitled to compensation, the reasonable expenses of burial,
not exceeding eleven thousand dollars, without deduction of any amount
previously paid or to be paid for compensation or for medical expenses,
shall be paid to his or her dependents, or if there are no dependents,
then to his or her personal representative. Beginning in 2023, the
Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court shall annually adjust the dollar
limitation in this subsection. The adjusted limitation shall be equal to
the then current limitation adjusted by the greater of one percent or the
percentage change, for the preceding year, in the Consumer Price Index
for All Urban Consumers, as prepared by the United States Department of
Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics. Any adjustment shall be effective on
July 1. The adjustment shall not exceed two and three-quarters percent
per annum. If the amount so adjusted is not a multiple of one hundred
dollars, the amount shall be rounded to the nearest multiple of one
hundred dollars.
(4) Compensation under the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act to
alien dependents who are not residents of the United States shall be the
same in amount as is provided in each case for residents, except that at
any time within one year after the death of the injured employee the
employer may at his or her option commute all future installments of
compensation to be paid to such alien dependents. The amount of the
commuted payment shall be determined as provided in section 48-138.
(5)(a)(i) Except as provided in subdivision (5)(a)(ii) of this
section, the consular officer of the nation of which the employee, whose
injury results in death, is a citizen shall be regarded as the sole legal
representative of any alien dependents of the employee residing outside
of the United States and representing the nationality of the employee.
-16-

LB1056 LB1056
2026 2026
(ii) At any time prior to the final settlement, a nonresident alien
dependent may file with the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court a power
of attorney designating any suitable person residing in this state to act
as attorney in fact in proceedings under the Nebraska Workers'
Compensation Act. If the compensation court determines that the interests
of the nonresident alien dependent will be better served by such person
than by the consular officer, the compensation court shall appoint such
person to act as attorney in fact in such proceedings. In making such
determination the court shall consider, among other things, whether a
consular officer's jurisdiction includes Nebraska and the responsiveness
of the consular officer to attempts made by an attorney representing the
employee to engage such consular officer in the proceedings.
(b) Such consular officer or appointed person shall have in behalf
of such nonresident alien dependents the exclusive right to institute
proceedings for, adjust, and settle all claims for compensation provided
by the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act and to receive the distribution
to such nonresident alien dependents of all compensation arising
thereunder.
(c) A person appointed under subdivision (5)(a)(ii) of this section
shall furnish a bond satisfactory to the compensation court conditioned
upon the proper application of any money received as compensation under
the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act. Before the bond is discharged,
such appointed person shall file with the compensation court a verified
account of receipts and disbursements of such money.
(d) For purposes of this section, consular officer means a consul
general, vice consul general, or vice consul or the representative of any
such official residing within the State of Nebraska.
(6) The changes made to this section by Laws 2019, LB418, apply to
cases under the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act that are pending on
September 1, 2019, and to cases filed on or after such date.
Sec. 5. Section 48-122.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
-17-

LB1056 LB1056
2026 2026
amended to read:
48-122.01 (1) Compensation under section 48-122 shall be payable in
the amount and to the following persons subject to the maximum limits
specified in sections 48-122 and 48-122.03:
(a) (1) If there is a widow or widower and no children of the
deceased, as defined in section 48-124, to such widow or widower,
seventy-five sixty-six and two-thirds percent of the average weekly wage
of the deceased, during widowhood or widowerhood;
(b) (2) To the widow or widower, if there is a child or children
living with the widow or widower, sixty-nine sixty percent of the average
weekly wage of the deceased, or sixty fifty-five percent, if such child
is not or such children are not living with a widow or widower, and, in
addition thereto, twenty-four fifteen percent for each child. When there
are two or more such children, the indemnity benefits payable on account
of such children shall be divided among such children, share and share
alike;
(c) (3) Two years' indemnity benefits in one lump sum shall be
payable to a widow or widower upon remarriage;
(d) (4) To the children, if there is no widow or widower, seventy-
five sixty-six and two-thirds percent of such wage for one child, and an
additional twenty-four fifteen percent for two or more children each
additional child, divided among such children, share and share alike;
(e) (5) The income benefits payable on account of any child under
this section shall cease when he or she dies, marries, or reaches the age
of nineteen, or when a child over such age ceases to be physically or
mentally incapable of self-support, or if actually dependent ceases to be
actually dependent, or, if enrolled as a full-time student in any
accredited educational institution, ceases to be so enrolled or reaches
the age of twenty-five. A child who originally qualified as a dependent
by virtue of being less than nineteen years of age may, upon reaching age
nineteen, continue to qualify if he or she satisfies the tests of being
-18-

LB1056 LB1056
2026 2026
physically or mentally incapable of self-support, actual dependency, or
enrollment in an educational institution;
(f) (6) To each parent, if actually dependent, thirty-four twenty-
five percent;
(g) (7) To the brothers, sisters, grandparents, and grandchildren,
if actually dependent, thirty-four twenty-five percent to each such
dependent. If there should be more than one of such dependents, the total
income benefits payable on account of such dependents shall be divided
share and share alike;
(h) (8) The income benefits of each beneficiary under subdivisions
(1)(f) and (g) (6) and (7) of this section shall be paid until he or she,
if a parent or grandparent, dies, marries, or ceases to be actually
dependent, or, if a brother, sister, or grandchild, dies, marries, or
reaches the age of nineteen or if over that age ceases to be physically
or mentally incapable of self-support, or ceases to be actually
dependent; and
(i) (9) A person ceases to be actually dependent when his or her
income from all sources exclusive of workers' compensation income
benefits is such that, if it had existed at the time as of which the
original determination of actual dependency was made, it would not have
supported a finding of dependency. In any event, if the present annual
income of an actual dependent person including workers' compensation
income benefits at any time exceeds the total annual support received by
the person from the deceased employee, the workers' compensation benefits
shall be reduced so that the total annual income is no greater than such
amount of annual support received from the deceased employee. In all
cases, a person found to be actually dependent shall be presumed to be no
longer actually dependent three years after each time as of which the
person was found to be actually dependent. This presumption may be
overcome by proof of continued actual dependency as defined in this
subdivision and section 48-124; and .
-19-

LB1056 LB1056
2026 2026
(j) If there is no spouse, child, or other dependent entitled to
benefits under this section, twenty-five thousand dollars to the personal
representative of the estate of the deceased.
(2)(a) Beginning in 2027, weekly income benefits under this section
lasting longer than twelve months shall be adjusted to account for
increases in the cost of living.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, COLA percentage means the
greater of:
(i) One percent; or
(ii) The percentage change, for the most recent twelve-month period
for which information is available, in the Consumer Price Index for Urban
Wage Earners and Clerical Workers, as prepared by the United States
Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics.
(c) On January 1, 2027, and on each January 1 thereafter, the
Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court shall determine the COLA percentage
that will apply for such calendar year.
(d) If a person receives a weekly income benefit under this section
that lasts longer than twelve months, the person's weekly income benefit
shall be automatically adjusted at the end of each twelve-month period.
The adjusted amount shall equal the then-current weekly income benefit
amount multiplied by the COLA percentage in effect for that calendar
year. The adjusted amount shall be computed to the next higher whole
dollar amount. Such adjusted amount shall apply for the next twelve-month
period.
(e) The cost-of-living adjustment provided for in this subsection
shall not result in a weekly income benefit that is more than the maximum
weekly income benefit specified in section 48-122 that is in effect at
the time the adjustment is made.
(f) The maximum limitation in section 48-122.03 shall not limit
increases in the weekly income benefit resulting from the cost-of-living
adjustment provided for in this subsection.
-20-

LB1056 LB1056
2026 2026
Sec. 6. Section 48-122.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-122.03 (1) The maximum weekly income benefits payable for all
beneficiaries in case of death shall not exceed two hundred seventy-five
percent of the average weekly wage of the deceased, subject to the
maximum limits in section 48-122. The maximum aggregate limitation shall
not operate in case of payment of two years' income benefits to the widow
or widower upon remarriage, as provided under subdivision (1)(c) (3) of
section 48-122.01, to prevent the immediate recalculation and payments of
benefits to the remaining beneficiaries as provided under section
48-122.02. The classes of beneficiaries specified in subdivisions (1)(a),
(b), and (d) (1), (2), and (4) of section 48-122.01 shall have priority
over all other beneficiaries in the apportionment of income benefits.
(2)(a) If there is a widow or widower and a child or children and
the maximums specified in section 48-122 and this section prevent full
payment under either maximum, the compensation shall be apportioned
between the widow or widower and the child or children on a pro rata
basis.
(b) If there is more than one child living with the widow or widower
and no child or children living separately, the apportionment shall be on
the pro rata basis of one hundred sixty percent to the widow or widower
and forty fifteen percent divided among the children.
(c) If there is more than one child not living with the widow or
widower and no child or children living with her or him, the
apportionment shall be on the pro rata basis of one hundred forty-six
fifty-five percent to the widow or widower and fifty-four twenty percent
divided among the children.
(d) If one or more children are living with and one or more children
are not living with her or him, the apportionment shall be on the pro
rata basis of one hundred forty-six fifty-five percent to the widow or
widower and fifty-four twenty percent divided among the children.
-21-

LB1056 LB1056
2026 2026
(3) If the provisions of this section should prevent payment to
other beneficiaries of the income benefits to the full extent otherwise
provided for, the gross remaining amount of income benefits payable to
such other beneficiaries shall be apportioned by class, proportionate to
the interest of each class in the remaining amount. Parents shall be
considered to be in one class and those specified in subdivision (1)(g)
(7) of section 48-122.01 in another class.
Sec. 7. Section 48-126, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-126 (1) Wherever in the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act the
term wages is used, it shall be construed to mean the money rate at which
the service rendered is recompensed under the contract of hiring in force
at the time of the accident.
(2) Wages It shall not include gratuities received from the employer
or others, nor shall it include board, lodging, or similar advantages
received from the employer, unless the money value of such advantages
shall have been fixed by the parties at the time of hiring, except that
if the workers' compensation insurer shall have collected a premium based
upon the value of such board, lodging, and similar advantages, then the
value thereof shall become a part of the basis of determining
compensation benefits.
(3) In occupations involving seasonal employment or employment
dependent upon the weather, the employee's weekly wages shall be taken to
be one-fiftieth of the total wages which he or she has earned from all
occupations during the year immediately preceding the accident, unless it
be shown that during such year, by reason of exceptional causes, such
method of computation does not fairly represent the earnings of the
employee. In such a case, the period for calculation shall be extended so
far as to give a basis for the fair ascertainment of his or her average
weekly earnings.
(4) In continuous employments, if immediately prior to the accident
-22-

LB1056 LB1056
2026 2026
the rate of wages was fixed by the day or hour or by the output of the
employee, his or her weekly wages shall be taken to be his or her average
weekly income for the period of time ordinarily constituting his or her
week's work, and using as the basis of calculation his or her earnings
during as much of the preceding six months as he or she worked for the
same employer, except as provided in sections 48-121 and 48-122. The
calculation shall also include be made with reference to the average
earnings for a working day of ordinary length and exclusive of earnings
from overtime , except that if the insurance company's policy of
insurance provides for the collection of a premium based upon such
overtime, then such overtime shall become a part of the basis of
determining compensation benefits.
Sec. 8. Section 48-134, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-134 (1) After an employee has given notice of an injury, as
provided in section 48-133, and from time to time thereafter during the
continuance of his or her disability, he or she shall, if so requested by
the employer or the insurance company carrying such risk, submit himself
or herself to an examination by a physician or surgeon legally authorized
to practice medicine under the laws of the state in which he or she
practices, furnished and paid for by the employer, or the insurance
company carrying such risk, as the case may be. The employee shall have
the right to have a physician provided and paid for by himself or herself
present at the examination. The unreasonable refusal of the employee to
submit to such examination shall deprive him or her of the right to
compensation under the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act during the
continuance of such refusal, and the period of such refusal shall be
deducted from the period during which compensation would otherwise be
payable.
(2) If the employee cannot readily understand or communicate in
English or another language spoken by the examining physician or surgeon,
-23-

LB1056 LB1056
2026 2026
the employer shall permit an interpreter to be present at the
examination. The employer shall be liable for all reasonable costs of
interpretation services related to such examination. The interpreter
shall be selected by the employee or the employee's representative from
the interpreter register created in Rule 6-702 of the Nebraska Supreme
Court Rules.
Sec. 9. Section 48-134.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-134.01 (1) The Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court may develop
and implement an independent medical examiner system consistent with the
requirements of this section. As part of such system, the compensation
court by a majority vote of the judges thereof may create, maintain, and
periodically validate a list of physicians that it finds to be the most
qualified and to be highly experienced and competent in their specific
fields of expertise and in the treatment of work-related injuries to
serve as independent medical examiners from each of the health care
specialties that the compensation court finds most commonly used by
injured employees. The compensation court may establish a fee schedule
for services rendered by independent medical examiners and may adopt and
promulgate any rules and regulations considered necessary to carry out
the purposes of this section.
(2) An independent medical examiner shall render medical findings on
the medical condition of an employee and related issues as specified
under this section. The independent medical examiner shall not be the
employee's treating physician and shall not have treated the employee
with respect to the injury for which the claim is being made or the
benefits are being paid.
(3) If the parties to a dispute cannot agree on an independent
medical examiner of their own choosing, the compensation court shall
assign an independent medical examiner from the list of qualified
examiners to render medical findings in any dispute relating to the
-24-

LB1056 LB1056
2026 2026
medical condition of a claimant and related issues, including, but not
limited to, whether the injured employee is able to perform any gainful
employment temporarily or permanently, what physical restrictions, if
any, would be imposed on the employee's employment, whether the injured
employee has reached maximum medical improvement, the existence and
extent of any permanent physical impairment, the reasonableness and
necessity of any medical treatment previously provided, or to be
provided, to the injured employee, and any other medical questions which
may pertain to causality and relatedness of the medical condition to the
employment.
(4) The compensation court may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations pertaining to the procedures before the independent medical
examiner, including the parties' ability to propound questions relating
to the medical condition of the employee and related issues to be
submitted to the independent medical examiner. In addition to the review
of records and information, the independent medical examiner may examine
the employee as often as the examiner determines necessary to render
medical findings on the questions propounded by the parties or by the
compensation court.
(5) If the employee cannot readily understand or communicate in
English or another language spoken by the independent medical examiner,
then an interpreter shall be present during any examination. The employer
shall be liable for all reasonable costs of interpretation services
related to any independent medical examination. The interpreter shall be
selected by the employee or the employee's representative from the
interpreter register created in Rule 6-702 of the Nebraska Supreme Court
Rules.
(6) (5) The independent medical examiner shall submit a written
report to the compensation court, the employer, and the employee stating
the examiner's medical findings on the issues raised and providing a
description of findings sufficient to explain the basis of those
-25-

LB1056 LB1056
2026 2026
findings. The fee for the examination and report shall be paid by the
employer.
(7) (6) The written report of the independent medical examiner's
findings shall be admissible in a proceeding before the compensation
court and may be received into evidence by the compensation court on its
own motion.
(8) (7) Any physician acting without malice and within the scope of
the physician's duties as an independent medical examiner shall be immune
from civil liability for making any report or other information available
to the compensation court or for assisting in the origination,
investigation, or preparation of the report or other information so
provided.
Sec. 10. Original sections 48-120, 48-121.01, 48-122, 48-122.01,
48-122.03, 48-126, 48-134, and 48-134.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and section 48-121, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, are repealed.
-26-